Texas statutes.
VERNON'S CIVIL STATUTES

TITLE 32. CORPORATIONS

CHAPTER 10. PUBLIC UTILITIES

Art. 1446a. DISRUPTION OF GAS, ELECTRIC OR WATER SERVICE BY PICKETING, THREATS OR INTIMIDATION.

Sec. 1. Repealed by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 166, Sec. 9, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 2. DEFINITIONS. When used in this Act, the term "public utility" or "utility" shall mean and include the following:

(a) Any private corporation doing business in Texas, and having the right of eminent domain, and engaged in the business of generating, transmitting or distributing electric energy to the public; or

(b) Any private corporation doing business in Texas, and having the right of eminent domain, and engaged in the business of producing, transmitting, or distributing natural or artificial gas to the public; or

(c) Any private corporation doing business in Texas, and having the right of eminent domain, and engaged in the business of furnishing water to the public; or

(d) Any state agency, authority, subdivision or municipality engaged in the business of furnishing any of the above described services to the public.

Secs. 3, 4. Repealed by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 166, Sec. 9, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 5. SABOTAGE; PENALTY. Any person who shall wilfully damage or destroy any building, equipment, machinery or facility used in furnishing utility service by any utility as defined in Section 2 hereof, or who interferes with, or commits any act of sabotage affecting any machinery, equipment, or facilities of any such utility for the purpose of disrupting the service provided by such utility, or for the purpose of preventing the maintenance of such service, shall be guilty of a felony, and, upon conviction, shall be punished by confinement in the state penitentiary for not less than two (2) years, nor more than five (5) years.

The word "sabotage" as used in this Act shall be construed to include any intentional tampering with, obstructing, breaking, damaging, changing or in any way interfering with any building, machinery, structure, wires, poles, towers, pumps, pipe lines, meters, switches, transformers, or any other equipment or property of any sort used by a utility as defined herein in furnishing water, gas, or electric service.

Sec. 5-a. CONSPIRACY; PENALTY. If any two or more persons shall enter into any agreement, compact, or plan to violate any of the provisions of Section 5 of this Act, or any agreement, compact, or plan to persuade, induce or employ some person to violate the provisions of said section, every person participating in such agreement, compact or plan shall be guilty of a felony, and, upon conviction, shall be punished by confinement in the state penitentiary for not less than two (2) nor more than five (5) years. In order that such offense be complete, it shall not be necessary that an overt act be committed pursuant to such agreement, compact or plan. The provisions of this section shall be cumulative of other statutes relating to conspiracy.

Secs. 6 to 8. Repealed by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 166, Sec. 9, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Acts 1947, 50th Leg., p. 142, ch. 84, eff. Sept. 5, 1947.